District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1812.13

Compromises.

Repealed.

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 355, ch. 258, art. I, title XII, § 13
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-158, § 4, 25 DCR 7002
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(aa)(2), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-1812.13.
1973 Ed., § 47-1586l.
Section 410(e) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(b), (d), (f), (l), (n), (o), (r), (v), (x)through (aa), (cc), (ff), (gg), (ll), (pp), (vv), (ww), (aaa), (ccc), (eee), and (ggg) shall apply as of January 1, 2001.”